Montana, session 2025, HB262.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Early literacy instruction -- policy -- instructional requirements. (1)
Affirming that reading and language skills are generally the foundation on which a person's educational
potential is developed, the legislature declares that it is the policy of this state that reading instruction is based
on literacy strategies that are scientifically researched.
(2) Textbooks, THE DEVELOPMENT OF ACCREDITATION STANDARDS BY THE BOARD OF PUBLIC
EDUCATION, THE ADOPTION OF POLICY BY SCHOOL DISTRICTS, AND THE LOCAL PROCESS OF CURRICULUM
DEVELOPMENT, INCLUDING THE SELECTION OF TEXTBOOKS AND instructional materials, and THE DEVELOPMENT OF
teaching methods for reading instruction in the public schools of this state, may not include instruction related to
strategies or approaches that teach students to read based on meaning drawn from context, structure, syntax,
visual cues and pictures, or memory, including the instructional model commonly known as the three-cueing
system MUST MEET OR EXCEED THE MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (3).
(3) Early literacy instruction in the public schools of this state must AT A MINIMUM:
(a) be evidence-based AND SUPPORTED BY RESEARCH;
(b) follow a scope and sequence;
(c) be direct, systematic, explicit, and responsive; and
(d) include all of the following:
(i) phonics, including decoding and encoding and instruction in writing;
(ii) phonemic awareness and phonological awareness;
(iii) fluency, including oral language development;
(iv) vocabulary; and
(v) comprehension, including building background knowledge.
(4) As used in this section, "evidence-based" means demonstrating a rationale based on high-
quality research findings or positive evaluation that the activity, strategy, or intervention is likely to improve
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 262

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0262.2
student outcomes or other relevant outcomes and includes ongoing efforts to examine the effects of the activity,
strategy, or intervention.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 20, chapter 7, part 1, and the provisions of Title 20, chapter 7, part 1, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 262